Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.190

Handling, accounting, and disbursement of moneys.

(1) All money received by the commission from the assessment levied under this chapter and all moneys transferred to the commission under RCW 15.115.130(2) must be deposited in the banks designated by the commission and disbursed by order of the commission. RCW 43.01.050 does not apply to money collected under this chapter.

(2) The commission shall adopt rules or establish policies as it determines necessary to ensure proper accounting and disbursement of moneys received and held by the commission.

[ 2009 c 33 s 20.]